hu: Modellrepülő összeszereltségi szintje: Repülésre majdnem kész (ARF); Kösd és repülj (BNF); Készlet – részben összeszerelt; Készlet – összeszereletlen; Plug-and-play (PNP); Repülésre kész (RTF); Egyéb
it: Livello di assemblaggio del modello di aereo: Quasi pronto al volo (ARF); Bind-and-fly (BNF); Kit - parzialmente assemblato; Kit - non assemblato; Plug-and-play (PNP); Pronto al volo (RTF); Altro
el: Επίπεδο συναρμολόγησης μοντέλων αεροσκαφών: Σχεδόν έτοιμο για πτήση (ARF); Σύνδεσης και πτήσης (BNF); Κιτ - μερικώς συναρμολογημένο; Κιτ - μη συναρμολογημένο; Άμεσης λειτουργίας (PNP); Έτοιμο για πτήση (RTF); Άλλο
nb: Monteringsgrad for modellfly: Nesten flyklar (ARF); Bind-and-fly (BNF); Sett – delvis montert; Sett – umontert; Plug-and-play (PNP); Flyklar (RTF); Annet
nl: Modelvliegtuig montage niveau: Almost-ready-to-fly (ARF); Bind-and-fly (BNF); Bouwpakket - gedeeltelijk gemonteerd; Bouwpakket - ongemonteerd; Plug-and-play (PNP); Ready-to-fly (RTF); Overig
ro-RO: Nivelul de asamblare al modelului de aeronavă: Aproape gata de zbor (ARF); Asociază și zboară (BNF); Kit - asamblat parțial; Kit - neasamblat; Plug-and-play (PNP); Gata de zbor (RTF); Altele
bg-BG: Ниво на сглобяване на модели самолети: Почти готов за полет (ARF); Свържи и лети (BNF); Комплект - частично сглобен; Комплект - несглобен; Включи и играй (PNP); Готов за полет (RTF); Друго
lt-LT: Modelinio orlaivio surinkimo lygis: Beveik paruoštas skristi (ARF); Sujunk ir skrisk (BNF); Rinkinys – iš dalies surinktas; Rinkinys – nesurinktas; Prijunk ir naudok (PNP); Paruoštas skristi (RTF); Kita
sl-SI: Stopnja sestavljenosti modela letala: Skoraj pripravljeno za letenje (ARF); Poveži in leti (BNF); Komplet – delno sestavljeno; Komplet – nesestavljeno; Pripravljeno za uporabo (PNP); Pripravljeno za letenje (RTF); Drugo
da: Modelflys monteringsniveau: Almost-ready-to-fly (ARF); Bind-and-fly (BNF); Sæt – delvist samlet; Sæt – usamlet; Plug-and-play (PNP); Ready-to-fly (RTF); Andet
pt-PT: Nível de montagem de aeromodelos: Quase pronto a voar (ARF); Ligar e voar (BNF); Kit - parcialmente montado; Kit - por montar; Ligar e usar (PNP); Pronto a voar (RTF); Outro
zh-TW: 模型飛機組裝等級: 半完成機 (ARF); 對頻即飛 (BNF); 套件 - 部分組裝; 套件 - 未組裝; 隨插即用 (PNP); 到手即飛 (RTF); 其他
es: Nivel de ensamblaje de la maqueta de avión: Casi listo para volar (ARF); Vincular y volar (BNF); Kit parcialmente ensamblado; Kit sin ensamblar; Plug-and-play (PNP); Listo para volar (RTF); Otro
fr: Niveau d’assemblage du modèle réduit d’avion: Presque prêt à voler (ARF); Prêt à appairer (BNF); Kit - partiellement assemblé; Kit - non assemblé; Prêt à brancher (PNP); Prêt à voler (RTF); Autre
ru: Уровень сборки модели самолета: Почти готов к полету (ARF); Привяжи и лети (BNF); Набор (частично собранный); Набор (несобранный); Включай и лети (PNP); Готов к полету (RTF); Другое
tr: Model uçak montaj seviyesi: Uçuşa neredeyse hazır (ARF); Bağla ve uçur (BNF); Kit - kısmen monte edilmiş; Kit - monte edilmemiş; Tak ve çalıştır (PNP); Uçuşa hazır (RTF); Diğer
zh-CN: 模型飞机组装等级: 几乎可直接飞行（ARF）; 绑定即飞（BNF）; 套件 - 部分组装; 套件 - 未组装; 即插即用（PNP）; 随时可飞（RTF）; 其他
pt-BR: Aeromodelo nível de montagem: Quase pronto para voar (ARF); Vincular e voar (BNF); Kit - parcialmente montado; Kit - desmontado; Plug-and-play (PNP); Pronto para voar (RTF); Outro
sk-SK: Montážna náročnosť modelov lietadiel: Takmer pripravené na let (ARF); Spárovať a letieť (BNF); Súprava – čiastočne zmontovaná; Súprava – nezmontovaná; Plug-and-play (PNP); Pripravené na let (RTF); Iné
ko: 모형 항공기 조립 수준: 반조립식(ARF); 바인드앤플라이(BNF); 키트 - 부분 조립됨; 키트 - 조립 안 됨; 플러그앤플레이(PNP); 완제품(RTF); 기타
hr-HR: Razina montaže modela zrakoplova: Gotovo spremno za let (ARF); Poveži i leti (BNF); Komplet - djelomično sastavljen; Komplet - nesastavljen; Sustav uključi-i-radi (PNP); Spremno za let (RTF); Ostalo
vi: Mức độ lắp ráp mô hình máy bay: Gần như sẵn sàng bay (ARF); Kết nối là bay (BNF); Bộ lắp ráp - đã lắp ráp một phần; Bộ lắp ráp - chưa lắp ráp; Cắm là chạy (PNP); Sẵn sàng bay (RTF); Khác
de: Montagegrad des Modellflugzeugs: Fast flugfertig (ARF); Bind-and-fly (BNF); Bausatz – teilmontiert; Bausatz – unmontiert; Plug-and-play (PNP); Ready-to-fly (RTF); Sonstige
sv: Monteringsgrad för modellflygplan: Nästan flygklar (ARF); Bind-and-fly (BNF); Byggsats – delvis monterad; Byggsats – omonterad; Plug-and-play (PNP); Flygklar (RTF); Annan
cs: Úroveň montáže modelů letadel: Téměř připraveno k letu (ARF); Spáruj a leť (BNF); Stavebnice – částečně sestavená; Stavebnice – nesestavená; Plug-and-play (PNP); Připraveno k letu (RTF); Jiné
en: Model aircraft assembly level: Almost-ready-to-fly (ARF); Bind-and-fly (BNF); Kit - partially assembled; Kit - unassembled; Plug-and-play (PNP); Ready-to-fly (RTF); Other
th: ระดับการประกอบโมเดลเครื่องบิน: เกือบพร้อมบิน (ARF); ผูกสัญญาณและพร้อมบิน (BNF); ชุดประกอบ - ประกอบมาแล้วบางส่วน; ชุดประกอบ - ยังไม่ประกอบ; ปลั๊กแอนด์เพลย์ (PNP); พร้อมบิน (RTF); อื่นๆ
fi: Mallilentokoneiden kokoonpanotaso: Melkein lentovalmis (ARF); Sido ja lennä (BNF); Sarja – osittain koottu; Sarja – kokoamaton; Plug-and-play (PNP); Lentovalmis (RTF); Muu
ja: 模型航空機の組み立てレベル: 飛行ほぼ準備完了 (ARF); バインド・アンド・フライ (BNF); キット - 部分組み立て済み; キット - 未組み立て; プラグアンドプレイ (PNP); 飛行準備完了 (RTF); その他
pl: Poziom montażu modelu samolotu: Prawie gotowe do lotu (ARF); Połącz i leć (BNF); Zestaw – częściowo zmontowany; Zestaw – niezmontowany; Plug-and-play (PNP); Gotowe do lotu (RTF); Inne